New Jersey, session 221, A3501.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Advertisement" means any circulation, mailing, posting, or any other form of publication, utilizing any media, promoting an employer or intending to alert its audience, regardless of size, to the availability of any position of employment. "Employer" means any person, company, corporation, firm, labor organization, or association which has 10 or more employees over 20 calendar weeks and does business, employs persons, or takes applications for employment within this State, including the State, any county or municipality, or any instrumentality thereof. The term shall include job placement and referral agencies and other employment agencies, but excludes the United States or any of its departments, agencies, boards, or commissions, or any employee or agent thereof. "Employment" means any occupation, vocation, job, or work with pay, including temporary or seasonal work, contingent work, and work through the services of a temporary or other employment agency; any form of vocational apprenticeship; or any internship.  The physical location of the prospective employment shall be in whole, or substantial part, within this State. b.    An employer posting an advertisement for employment in the State on any platform, whether the platform is owned or controlled by the employer or is a third-party platform, shall disclose in the posting the following information: (1) the minimum and maximum salary or hourly wage rate range for the position; (2) any supplemental compensation for which the position is eligible; (3) a description of the benefits provided for the position, including, but not limited to, paid leave, health care plans, and dental plans; and (4) retirement plans offered through the employer. c.     Any employer who violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for the first violation, $5,000 for the second violation, and $10,000 for each subsequent violation collectible by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.